Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4557.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the most recent edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following new section:
Local Approval Requirement for Battery Storage Facilities.
(a) Definitions- As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
"Battery storage facility"- a facility that uses batteries to store and distribute electrical
energy.
"Municipal governing body"- the elected city council, selectboard, or other legislative
authority of a municipality.
of 3

"State permitting authority"- any state agency responsible for granting permits related to
energy infrastructure, including but not limited to the Department of Public Utilities and the
Energy Facilities Siting Board.
(b) Local Approval Requirement- (1) No state permitting authority shall approve a
battery storage facility unless the municipal governing body of the municipality in which the
facility is proposed has voted to approve the project. (2) Municipalities shall have the authority
to establish additional siting, safety, and environmental requirements for battery energy storage
facilities, provided such requirements do not conflict with state law.
(c) Public Hearing Requirement- (1) Prior to any municipal vote on a proposed battery
storage facility, the municipality shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit input from
residents and stakeholders. (2) The project applicant shall be required to present detailed plans,
including risk assessments, emergency response protocols, and environmental impact analyses,
at the public hearing. (3) The municipal governing body shall consider public input in making its
determination on the project.
(d) Coordination with State Agencies- (1) The state permitting authority shall provide
technical assistance to municipalities in evaluating proposed projects but shall not override a
municipality’s decision to deny a project. (2) Municipalities and state agencies shall coordinate
to ensure compliance with all applicable safety, environmental, and zoning regulations.
(e) Enforcement and Penalties- (1) Any battery storage facility constructed or operated
without municipal approval in violation of this section shall be subject to fines of up to $100,000
per violation and shall be required to cease operations until compliance is achieved. (2) The
of 3

Attorney General shall have the authority to enforce this section and seek injunctive relief where
necessary.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 3